Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4001
Nebraska Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, how cited.

Sections 48-4001 to 48-4006 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 1.
July 18, 2026